Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201921-529
Series limited liability company; prohibited acts.

A series limited liability company may not be:

(1) an acquiring, acquired, converting, converted, domesticating, or domesticated organization; or

(2) except as otherwise provided in section 21-530, a party to or the surviving company of a merger.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 30;

Laws 2019, LB78, § 16.